Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2254
Office; investigations; procedure.

The office shall investigate and seek to resolve complaints and concerns communicated by or on behalf of a resident. The office may initiate investigations based on its observations of the conditions in a long-term care facility. If the office does not investigate a complaint, the complainant shall be notified of the decision not to investigate and the reasons for the decision.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 18;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 18.